Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.220

Violation of injunction—Civil penalty.

Any person who violates any injunction issued pursuant to this chapter shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars. For the purpose of this section the superior court issuing any injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties.

[ 1967 c 201 s 22.]